North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 12. Clerk of Superior Court.

§ 7A-100.
Election; term of office; oath; vacancy; office and office hours; appointment of acting clerk.

A clerk of the superior court for each county shall be elected by the qualified voters thereof, to hold office for a term of four years, in the manner prescribed by Chapter 163 of the General Statutes. The clerk, before entering on the duties of his office, shall take the oath of office prescribed by law. If the office of clerk of superior court becomes vacant otherwise than by the expiration of the term, or if the people fail to elect a clerk, the senior regular resident superior court judge for the county shall fill the vacancy by appointment until an election can be regularly held. In cases of death or resignation of the clerk, the senior regular resident superior court judge, pending appointment of a successor clerk, may appoint an acting clerk of superior court for a period of not longer than 30 days.

The county commissioners shall provide an office for the clerk in the courthouse or other suitable place in the county seat. The clerk shall observe such office hours and holidays as may be directed by the Administrative Officer of the Courts.

History.

Const., art. 4, ss. 16, 17, 29; C.C.P., ss. 139-141; 1871-72, c. 136; Code, ss. 74, 76, 78, 80, 114, 115; 1903, c. 467; Rev., ss. 890-893, 895, 909, 910; C.S., ss. 926, 930, 931, 945, 946; 1935, c. 348; 1939, c. 82; 1941, c. 329; 1949, c. 122, ss. 1, 2; 1971, c. 363, s. 1; 1973, c. 240; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Local Modification.

Brunswick: 1955, c. 1259; Currituck: 1939, ch. 82, s. 3; Gates: 1959, c. 254; Moore, Richmond: 1939, c. 82, s. 3; Wake: 1955, c. 1168.

Cross References.

As to oath, see

G.S. 11-7

, 11-11.

As to wilfully failing to discharge duties as ground for removal, see

G.S. 14-230

.

As to bonding requirements, see

G.S. 58-72-35

, 58-72-40.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Subchapter III of Chapter 163A” for “Chapter 163” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subsection (a).

§ 7A-101.
Compensation. [Effective until July 1, 2022]

The clerk of superior court is a full-time employee of the State and shall receive an annual salary, payable in equal monthly installments, based on the number of State-funded assistant and deputy clerks of court as determined by the Administrative Office of Court’s workload formula, according to the following schedule:

Click to view

If the number of State-funded assistant and deputy clerks of court as determined by the Administrative Office of Court’s workload formula changes, the salary of the clerk shall be changed, on July 1 of the fiscal year for which the change is reported, to the salary appropriate for that new number, except that the salary of an incumbent clerk shall not be decreased by any change in that number during the clerk’s continuance in office.

(a1)

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-209, s. 3.5(a), effective July 1, 2019.

The clerk shall receive no fees or commission by virtue of the clerk’s office. The salary set forth in this section is the clerk’s sole official compensation.

In lieu of merit and other increment raises paid to regular State employees, a clerk of superior court shall receive as longevity pay an amount equal to four and eight-tenths percent (4.8%) of the clerk’s annual salary payable monthly after five years of service, nine and six-tenths percent (9.6%) after 10 years of service, fourteen and four-tenths percent (14.4%) after 15 years of service, nineteen and two-tenths percent (19.2%) after 20 years of service, and twenty-four percent (24%) after 25 years of service. Service shall mean service in the elective position of clerk of superior court, as an assistant clerk of court and as a supervisor of clerks of superior court with the Administrative Office of the Courts and shall not include service as a deputy or acting clerk. Service shall also mean service as a justice, judge, or magistrate of the General Court of Justice or as a district attorney.

Assistants and Deputies Annual Salary 0-19 $99,809 20-29 110,316 30-49 120,822 50-99 131,328 100 and above 133,955

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1967, c. 691, s. 5; 1969, c. 1186, s. 3; 1971, c. 877, ss. 1, 2; 1973, c. 571, ss. 1, 2; 1975, c. 956, s. 7; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 11; 1977, c. 802, s. 42; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1136, s. 13; 1979, c. 838, s. 85; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1137, s. 12; 1981, c. 964, s. 14; c. 1127, s. 12; 1983, c. 761, ss. 200, 247, 249; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, ss. 86, 87; c. 1109, s. 13.1; 1985, c. 479, s. 211; c. 689, s. 3; c. 698, s. 10(c); 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 34; 1987, c. 738, s. 20; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 14; c. 1100, ss. 16(a), 17; 1989, c. 752, s. 31; c. 799, s. 27(a); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 40; c. 1039, s. 21; 1993, c. 321, s. 57(a); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.10(a); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 28.4; 1997-443, s. 33.9; 1998-153, s. 7; 1999-237, s. 28.4; 2000-67, s. 26.4; 2000-140, s. 93.1(b); 2001-424, ss. 12.2(b), 32.5; 2004-124, s. 31.5(b); 2005-276, ss. 29.5, 29.23B; 2006-66, s. 22.5; 2007-323, ss. 28.5, 28.18A(e); 2008-107, s. 26.5; 2012-142, s. 25.1A(e); 2014-100, s. 35.3(d); 2016-94, s. 36.4; 2017-57, s. 35.4A; 2018-5, s. 35.5; 2019-209, s. 3.5(a), (b); 2021-180, s. 39.6(a).

Section Set Out Twice.

The above section is effective until July 1, 2022. For the section as in effect on July 1, 2022, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 7A-101

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-66, s. 22.5, effective July 1, 2006, updated the Annual Salaries in the first paragraph of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2007-323, ss. 28.5 and 28.18A(e), effective July 1, 2007, in subsection (a), increased the annual salaries of the clerks and deleted the former second paragraph which described the percentage of the clerk salaries to the salary of a chief district court judge; in the first sentence of subsection (c), deleted “and” preceding “nineteen” and added “and twenty-four percent (24%) after 25 years of service” at the end.

Session Laws 2008-107, s. 26.5, effective July 1, 2008, updated the Annual Salary column in the first paragraph of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2012-142, s. 25.1A(e), effective July 1, 2012, updated the Annual Salaries in the first paragraph of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 35.3(d), effective July 1, 2014, rewrote the annual salary values in the table in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 36.4, effective July 1, 2016, in the “Annual Salary” column of the table in subsection (a), substituted “$88,188” for “$84,390,” “98,834” for “ 94,578,” “109,480” for “104,766” and “120,131” for “114,958.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 35.4A, effective July 1, 2017, in the “Annual Salary” column of the table in subsection (a), substituted “$89,188” for “$88,188”, “$99,834” for “$98,834”, “$110,480” for “$109,480”, and “$121,131” for “$120,131”.

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 35.5, effective July 1, 2018, increased the annual salary amounts in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2019-209, s. 3.5(a), effective July 1, 2019, rewrote this section.

Session Laws 2019-209, s. 3.5(b), effective July 1, 2020, rewrote the table titled “Annual Salary” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 39.6(a), effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (a), under “Annual Salary”, substituted “$99,809” for “$97,375; substituted “110,316” for “107,625; substituted “120,822” for “117,875”; substituted “131,328” for “128,125”; substituted “133,955” for “130,688.”

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “A Perfect Storm:
Prosecutorial Calendar Control and the Right to a Speedy Trial in the North Carolina Criminal Court System,” see 56 Wake Forest L. Rev. 169 (2021).

§ 7A-101.
Compensation. [Effective July 1, 2022]

The clerk of superior court is a full-time employee of the State and shall receive an annual salary, payable in equal monthly installments, based on the number of State-funded assistant and deputy clerks of court as determined by the Administrative Office of Court’s workload formula, according to the following schedule:

Click to view

If the number of State-funded assistant and deputy clerks of court as determined by the Administrative Office of Court’s workload formula changes, the salary of the clerk shall be changed, on July 1 of the fiscal year for which the change is reported, to the salary appropriate for that new number, except that the salary of an incumbent clerk shall not be decreased by any change in that number during the clerk’s continuance in office.

(a1)

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-209, s. 3.5(a), effective July 1, 2019.

The clerk shall receive no fees or commission by virtue of the clerk’s office. The salary set forth in this section is the clerk’s sole official compensation.

In lieu of merit and other increment raises paid to regular State employees, a clerk of superior court shall receive as longevity pay an amount equal to four and eight-tenths percent (4.8%) of the clerk’s annual salary payable monthly after five years of service, nine and six-tenths percent (9.6%) after 10 years of service, fourteen and four-tenths percent (14.4%) after 15 years of service, nineteen and two-tenths percent (19.2%) after 20 years of service, and twenty-four percent (24%) after 25 years of service. Service shall mean service in the elective position of clerk of superior court, as an assistant clerk of court and as a supervisor of clerks of superior court with the Administrative Office of the Courts and shall not include service as a deputy or acting clerk. Service shall also mean service as a justice, judge, or magistrate of the General Court of Justice or as a district attorney.

Assistants and Deputies Annual Salary 0-19 $102,305 20-29 110,316113,074 30-49 120,822123,842 50-99 131,328134,611 100 and above 133,955137,304

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1967, c. 691, s. 5; 1969, c. 1186, s. 3; 1971, c. 877, ss. 1, 2; 1973, c. 571, ss. 1, 2; 1975, c. 956, s. 7; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 11; 1977, c. 802, s. 42; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1136, s. 13; 1979, c. 838, s. 85; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1137, s. 12; 1981, c. 964, s. 14; c. 1127, s. 12; 1983, c. 761, ss. 200, 247, 249; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, ss. 86, 87; c. 1109, s. 13.1; 1985, c. 479, s. 211; c. 689, s. 3; c. 698, s. 10(c); 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 34; 1987, c. 738, s. 20; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 14; c. 1100, ss. 16(a), 17; 1989, c. 752, s. 31; c. 799, s. 27(a); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 40; c. 1039, s. 21; 1993, c. 321, s. 57(a); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 7.10(a); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 28.4; 1997-443, s. 33.9; 1998-153, s. 7; 1999-237, s. 28.4; 2000-67, s. 26.4; 2000-140, s. 93.1(b); 2001-424, ss. 12.2(b), 32.5; 2004-124, s. 31.5(b); 2005-276, ss. 29.5, 29.23B; 2006-66, s. 22.5; 2007-323, ss. 28.5, 28.18A(e); 2008-107, s. 26.5; 2012-142, s. 25.1A(e); 2014-100, s. 35.3(d); 2016-94, s. 36.4; 2017-57, s. 35.4A; 2018-5, s. 35.5; 2019-209, s. 3.5(a), (b); 2021-180, s. 39.6(a), (a1).

Section Set Out Twice.

The above section is effective July 1, 2022. For the section as in effect until July 1, 2022, see the preceding
section, also numbered

G.S. 7A-101

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 39.6(a1), amended this section in the coded bill drafting format provided by

G.S. 120-20.1

. Except for the first line of the “Annual Salary” column in subsection (a), the act did not strike through the former salary figures when adding the new salary figures. Subsection (a) has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-66, s. 22.5, effective July 1, 2006, updated the Annual Salaries in the first paragraph of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2007-323, ss. 28.5 and 28.18A(e), effective July 1, 2007, in subsection (a), increased the annual salaries of the clerks and deleted the former second paragraph which described the percentage of the clerk salaries to the salary of a chief district court judge; in the first sentence of subsection (c), deleted “and” preceding “nineteen” and added “and twenty-four percent (24%) after 25 years of service” at the end.

Session Laws 2008-107, s. 26.5, effective July 1, 2008, updated the Annual Salary column in the first paragraph of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2012-142, s. 25.1A(e), effective July 1, 2012, updated the Annual Salaries in the first paragraph of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 35.3(d), effective July 1, 2014, rewrote the annual salary values in the table in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 36.4, effective July 1, 2016, in the “Annual Salary” column of the table in subsection (a), substituted “$88,188” for “$84,390,” “98,834” for “ 94,578,” “109,480” for “104,766” and “120,131” for “114,958.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 35.4A, effective July 1, 2017, in the “Annual Salary” column of the table in subsection (a), substituted “$89,188” for “$88,188”, “$99,834” for “$98,834”, “$110,480” for “$109,480”, and “$121,131” for “$120,131”.

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 35.5, effective July 1, 2018, increased the annual salary amounts in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2019-209, s. 3.5(a), effective July 1, 2019, rewrote this section.

Session Laws 2019-209, s. 3.5(b), effective July 1, 2020, rewrote the table titled “Annual Salary” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 39.6(a), effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (a), under “Annual Salary”, substituted “$99,809” for “$97,375; substituted “110,316” for “107,625; substituted “120,822” for “117,875”; substituted “131,328” for “128,125”; substituted “133,955” for “130,688.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 39.6(a1), effective July 1, 2022, in subsection (a), made adjustments to the “Annual Salary” figures. See editor's notes.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “A Perfect Storm:
Prosecutorial Calendar Control and the Right to a Speedy Trial in the North Carolina Criminal Court System,” see 56 Wake Forest L. Rev. 169 (2021).

§ 7A-102.
Assistant and deputy clerks; appointment; number; salaries; duties. [Effective until July 1, 2022]

The numbers and salaries of assistant clerks, deputy clerks, and other employees in the office of each clerk of superior court shall be determined by the Administrative Officer of the Courts after consultation with the clerk concerned. However, no office of clerk of superior court shall have fewer than five total staff positions in addition to the elected clerk of superior court. All personnel in the clerk’s office are employees of the State. The clerk appoints the assistants, deputies, and other employees in the clerk’s office to serve at his or her pleasure. Assistant and deputy clerks shall take the oath of office prescribed for clerks of superior court, conformed to the office of assistant or deputy clerk, as the case may be. Except as provided by subsection (c2) of this section, the job classifications and related salaries of each employee within the office of each superior court clerk shall be subject to the approval of the Administrative Officer of the Courts after consultation with each clerk concerned and shall be subject to the availability of funds appropriated for that purpose by the General Assembly.

An assistant clerk is authorized to perform all the duties and functions of the office of clerk of superior court, and any act of an assistant clerk is entitled to the same faith and credit as that of the clerk. A deputy clerk is authorized to certify the existence and correctness of any record in the clerk’s office, to take the proofs and examinations of the witnesses touching the execution of a will as required by G.S. 31-17, and to perform any other ministerial act which the clerk may be authorized and empowered to do, in his own name and without reciting the name of his principal. The clerk is responsible for the acts of his assistants and deputies. With the consent of the clerk of superior court of each county and the consent of the presiding judge in any proceeding, an assistant or deputy clerk is authorized to perform all the duties and functions of the office of the clerk of superior court in another county in any proceeding in the district or superior court that has been transferred to that county from the county in which the assistant or deputy clerk is employed.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), the Administrative Officer of the Courts shall establish an incremental salary plan for assistant clerks and for deputy clerks based on a series of salary steps corresponding to the steps contained in the Salary Plan for State Employees adopted by the Office of State Human Resources, subject to a minimum and a maximum annual salary as set forth below. On and after July 1, 1985, each assistant clerk and each deputy clerk shall be eligible for an annual step increase in his salary plan based on satisfactory job performance as determined by each clerk. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if an assistant or deputy clerk’s years of service in the office of superior court clerk would warrant an annual salary greater than the salary first established under this section, that assistant or deputy clerk shall be eligible on and after July 1, 1984, for an annual step increase in his salary plan. Furthermore, on and after July 1, 1985, that assistant or deputy clerk shall be eligible for an increase of two steps in his salary plan, and shall remain eligible for a two-step increase each year as recommended by each clerk until that assistant or deputy clerk’s annual salary corresponds to his number of years of service. Any person covered by this subsection who would not receive a step increase in fiscal year 1995-96 because that person is at the top of the salary range as it existed for fiscal year 1994-95 shall receive a salary increase to the maximum annual salary provided by subsection (c1) of this section.

(c1)

A full-time assistant clerk or a full-time deputy clerk, and up to one full-time deputy clerk serving as head bookkeeper per county, shall be paid an annual salary subject to the following minimum and maximum rates:

Click to view

(c2)

The clerk of superior court may appoint assistant clerks, deputy clerks, and a head bookkeeper and set their salaries above the minimum rate established for the positions by subsection (c1) of this section if, in the clerk’s discretion, (i) the needs of the clerk’s office would be best served by an appointment above the minimum rate, (ii) the appointee’s skills and experience support the higher rate, and (iii) the Administrative Office of the Courts certifies that there are sufficient funds available.

Full-time assistant clerks, licensed to practice law in North Carolina, who are employed in the office of superior court clerk on and after July 1, 1984, and full-time assistant clerks possessing a masters degree in business administration, public administration, accounting, or other similar discipline from an accredited college or university who are employed in the office of superior court clerk on and after July 1, 1997, are authorized an annual salary of not less than three-fourths of the maximum annual salary established for assistant clerks; the clerk of superior court, with the approval of the Administrative Office of the Courts, may establish a higher annual salary but that salary shall not be higher than the maximum annual salary established for assistant clerks. Full-time assistant clerks, holding a law degree from an accredited law school, who are employed in the office of superior court clerk on and after July 1, 1984, are authorized an annual salary of not less than two-thirds of the maximum annual salary established for assistant clerks; the clerk of superior court, with the approval of the Administrative Office of the Courts, may establish a higher annual salary, but the entry-level salary may not be more than three-fourths of the maximum annual salary established for assistant clerks, and in no event may be higher than the maximum annual salary established for assistant clerks. Except as provided by subsection (c2) of this section, the entry-level annual salary for all other assistant and deputy clerks employed on and after July 1, 1984, shall be at the minimum rates as herein established.

A clerk of superior court may apply to the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts to enter into contracts with local governments for the provision by the State of services of assistant clerks, deputy clerks, and other employees in the office of each clerk of superior court pursuant to

G.S. 153A-212.1

or

G.S. 160A-289.1

.

The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts may provide assistance requested pursuant to subsection (e) of this section only upon a showing by the senior resident superior court judge, supported by facts, that the overwhelming public interest warrants the use of additional resources for the speedy disposition of cases involving drug offenses, domestic violence, or other offenses involving a threat to public safety.

The terms of any contract entered into with local governments pursuant to subsection (e) of this section shall be fixed by the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts in each case. Nothing in this section shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to make any appropriation to implement the provisions of this section or to obligate the Administrative Office of the Courts to provide the administrative costs of establishing or maintaining the positions or services provided for under this section. Further, nothing in this section shall be construed to obligate the Administrative Office of the Courts to maintain positions or services initially provided for under this section.

Assistant Clerks and Head Bookkeeper Annual Salary Minimum $35,650 Maximum 65,864 Deputy Clerks Annual Salary Minimum $31,980 Maximum 51,728.

History.

1777, c. 115, s. 86; P.R; R.C., c. 19, s. 15; Code, s. 75; 1899, c. 235, ss. 2, 3; Rev., ss. 898-900; 1921, c. 32, ss. 1-3; C.S., ss. 934(a)-934(c), 935-937; 1951, c. 159, ss. 1, 2; 1959, c. 1297; 1963, c. 1187; 1965, c. 264; c. 310, s. 1; 1971, c. 363, s. 2; 1973, c. 678; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, ss. 88, 89; 1985, c. 479, s. 212; c. 757, s. 190; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 35; 1987, c. 738, s. 21(a); 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 15; 1989, c. 445; c. 752, s. 32; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, ss. 42, 119; 1993, c. 321, ss. 58, 59; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, ss. 7.11, 7.12; 1995, c. 507, s. 7.6(a), (b); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 28.5; 1997-443, ss. 33.12, 33.10(b); 1998-153, s. 8(b); 1999-237, s. 28.5; 2000-67, ss. 15.4(b), 26.5; 2001-424, s. 32.6; 2003-284, s. 30.14B; 2004-124, s. 31.6(b); 2005-276, s. 29.6; 2006-66, s. 22.6; 2007-323, s. 28.6; 2008-107, s. 26.6; 2011-145, s. 15.8; 2012-142, s. 25.1A(f); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2014-100, s. 35.3(e); 2016-94, s. 36.5(a); 2017-57, s. 35.4B; 2018-5, s. 35.6; 2019-209, ss. 3.6(a), (a1); 2021-180, s. 39.7(a).

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2022. For the section as amended July 1, 2022, see the following version, also numbered

G.S. 7A-102

.

§ 7A-102.
Assistant and deputy clerks; appointment; number; salaries; duties. [Effective July 1, 2022]

The numbers and salaries of assistant clerks, deputy clerks, and other employees in the office of each clerk of superior court shall be determined by the Administrative Officer of the Courts after consultation with the clerk concerned. However, no office of clerk of superior court shall have fewer than five total staff positions in addition to the elected clerk of superior court. All personnel in the clerk’s office are employees of the State. The clerk appoints the assistants, deputies, and other employees in the clerk’s office to serve at his or her pleasure. Assistant and deputy clerks shall take the oath of office prescribed for clerks of superior court, conformed to the office of assistant or deputy clerk, as the case may be. Except as provided by subsection (c2) of this section, the job classifications and related salaries of each employee within the office of each superior court clerk shall be subject to the approval of the Administrative Officer of the Courts after consultation with each clerk concerned and shall be subject to the availability of funds appropriated for that purpose by the General Assembly.

An assistant clerk is authorized to perform all the duties and functions of the office of clerk of superior court, and any act of an assistant clerk is entitled to the same faith and credit as that of the clerk. A deputy clerk is authorized to certify the existence and correctness of any record in the clerk’s office, to take the proofs and examinations of the witnesses touching the execution of a will as required by G.S. 31-17, and to perform any other ministerial act which the clerk may be authorized and empowered to do, in his own name and without reciting the name of his principal. The clerk is responsible for the acts of his assistants and deputies. With the consent of the clerk of superior court of each county and the consent of the presiding judge in any proceeding, an assistant or deputy clerk is authorized to perform all the duties and functions of the office of the clerk of superior court in another county in any proceeding in the district or superior court that has been transferred to that county from the county in which the assistant or deputy clerk is employed.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), the Administrative Officer of the Courts shall establish an incremental salary plan for assistant clerks and for deputy clerks based on a series of salary steps corresponding to the steps contained in the Salary Plan for State Employees adopted by the Office of State Human Resources, subject to a minimum and a maximum annual salary as set forth below. On and after July 1, 1985, each assistant clerk and each deputy clerk shall be eligible for an annual step increase in his salary plan based on satisfactory job performance as determined by each clerk. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if an assistant or deputy clerk’s years of service in the office of superior court clerk would warrant an annual salary greater than the salary first established under this section, that assistant or deputy clerk shall be eligible on and after July 1, 1984, for an annual step increase in his salary plan. Furthermore, on and after July 1, 1985, that assistant or deputy clerk shall be eligible for an increase of two steps in his salary plan, and shall remain eligible for a two-step increase each year as recommended by each clerk until that assistant or deputy clerk’s annual salary corresponds to his number of years of service. Any person covered by this subsection who would not receive a step increase in fiscal year 1995-96 because that person is at the top of the salary range as it existed for fiscal year 1994-95 shall receive a salary increase to the maximum annual salary provided by subsection (c1) of this section.

(c1)

A full-time assistant clerk or a full-time deputy clerk, and up to one full-time deputy clerk serving as head bookkeeper per county, shall be paid an annual salary subject to the following minimum and maximum rates:

Click to view

(c2)

The clerk of superior court may appoint assistant clerks, deputy clerks, and a head bookkeeper and set their salaries above the minimum rate established for the positions by subsection (c1) of this section if, in the clerk’s discretion, (i) the needs of the clerk’s office would be best served by an appointment above the minimum rate, (ii) the appointee’s skills and experience support the higher rate, and (iii) the Administrative Office of the Courts certifies that there are sufficient funds available.

Full-time assistant clerks, licensed to practice law in North Carolina, who are employed in the office of superior court clerk on and after July 1, 1984, and full-time assistant clerks possessing a masters degree in business administration, public administration, accounting, or other similar discipline from an accredited college or university who are employed in the office of superior court clerk on and after July 1, 1997, are authorized an annual salary of not less than three-fourths of the maximum annual salary established for assistant clerks; the clerk of superior court, with the approval of the Administrative Office of the Courts, may establish a higher annual salary but that salary shall not be higher than the maximum annual salary established for assistant clerks. Full-time assistant clerks, holding a law degree from an accredited law school, who are employed in the office of superior court clerk on and after July 1, 1984, are authorized an annual salary of not less than two-thirds of the maximum annual salary established for assistant clerks; the clerk of superior court, with the approval of the Administrative Office of the Courts, may establish a higher annual salary, but the entry-level salary may not be more than three-fourths of the maximum annual salary established for assistant clerks, and in no event may be higher than the maximum annual salary established for assistant clerks. Except as provided by subsection (c2) of this section, the entry-level annual salary for all other assistant and deputy clerks employed on and after July 1, 1984, shall be at the minimum rates as herein established.

A clerk of superior court may apply to the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts to enter into contracts with local governments for the provision by the State of services of assistant clerks, deputy clerks, and other employees in the office of each clerk of superior court pursuant to

G.S. 153A-212.1

or

G.S. 160A-289.1

.

The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts may provide assistance requested pursuant to subsection (e) of this section only upon a showing by the senior resident superior court judge, supported by facts, that the overwhelming public interest warrants the use of additional resources for the speedy disposition of cases involving drug offenses, domestic violence, or other offenses involving a threat to public safety.

The terms of any contract entered into with local governments pursuant to subsection (e) of this section shall be fixed by the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts in each case. Nothing in this section shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to make any appropriation to implement the provisions of this section or to obligate the Administrative Office of the Courts to provide the administrative costs of establishing or maintaining the positions or services provided for under this section. Further, nothing in this section shall be construed to obligate the Administrative Office of the Courts to maintain positions or services initially provided for under this section.

Assistant Clerks and Head Bookkeeper Annual Salary Minimum $36,541 Maximum 67,511 Deputy Clerks Annual Salary Minimum $32,780 Maximum 53,021.

History.

1777, c. 115, s. 86; P.R; R.C., c. 19, s. 15; Code, s. 75; 1899, c. 235, ss. 2, 3; Rev., ss. 898-900; 1921, c. 32, ss. 1-3; C.S., ss. 934(a)-934(c), 935-937; 1951, c. 159, ss. 1, 2; 1959, c. 1297; 1963, c. 1187; 1965, c. 264; c. 310, s. 1; 1971, c. 363, s. 2; 1973, c. 678; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, ss. 88, 89; 1985, c. 479, s. 212; c. 757, s. 190; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1014, s. 35; 1987, c. 738, s. 21(a); 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1086, s. 15; 1989, c. 445; c. 752, s. 32; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, ss. 42, 119; 1993, c. 321, ss. 58, 59; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, ss. 7.11, 7.12; 1995, c. 507, s. 7.6(a), (b); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 28.5; 1997-443, ss. 33.12, 33.10(b); 1998-153, s. 8(b); 1999-237, s. 28.5; 2000-67, ss. 15.4(b), 26.5; 2001-424, s. 32.6; 2003-284, s. 30.14B; 2004-124, s. 31.6(b); 2005-276, s. 29.6; 2006-66, s. 22.6; 2007-323, s. 28.6; 2008-107, s. 26.6; 2011-145, s. 15.8; 2012-142, s. 25.1A(f); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2014-100, s. 35.3(e); 2016-94, s. 36.5(a); 2017-57, s. 35.4B; 2018-5, s. 35.6; 2019-209, ss. 3.6(a), (a1); 2021-180, ss. 39.7(a), (a1).

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2022. For the section as in effect until July 1, 2022, see the preceding version, also numbered

G.S. 7A-102

.

§ 7A-102.1.
Transfer of sick leave earned as county or municipal employees by certain employees in offices of clerks of superior court.

All assistant clerks, deputy clerks and other employees of the clerks of the superior court of this State, secretaries to superior court judges and district attorneys, and court reporters of the superior courts, who have heretofore been, or shall hereafter be, changed in status from county employees to State employees by reason of the enactment of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes, shall be entitled to transfer sick leave accumulated as a county employee pursuant to any county system and standing to the credit of such employee at the time of such change of status to State employee, without any maximum limitation thereof. Such earned sick leave credit shall be certified to the Administrative Office of the Courts by the official or employee responsible for keeping sick leave records for the county, and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall accord such transferred sick leave credit the same status as if it had been earned as a State employee.

All clerks, assistant clerks, deputy clerks and other employees of any court inferior to the superior court which has been or may be abolished by reason of the enactment of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes, who shall thereafter become a State employee by employment in the Judicial Department, shall be entitled to transfer sick leave earned as a municipal or county employee pursuant to any municipal or county system in effect on the date said court was abolished, without any maximum limitation thereof. Such earned sick leave credit shall be certified to the Administrative Office of the Courts by the official or employee responsible for keeping sick leave records for the municipality or county, and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall accord such transferred sick leave credit the same status as if it had been earned as a State employee.

Any employee covered by this section who retires on or after May 22, 1973, shall be given credit for all sick leave accumulated on May 22, 1973.

History.

1967, c. 1187, ss. 1, 2; 1969, c. 1190, s. 8; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; c. 795, ss. 1-3.

§ 7A-103.
Authority of clerk of superior court.

The clerk of superior court is authorized to:

Issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of any witness residing or being in the State, or to compel the production of any document or paper, material to any inquiry in his court.

Administer oaths, and to take acknowledgment and proof of the execution of all instruments or writings.

Issue commissions to take the testimony of any witness within or without the State.

Issue citations and orders to show cause to parties in all matters cognizable in his court, and to compel the appearance of such parties.

Enforce all lawful orders and decrees, by execution or otherwise, against those who fail to comply therewith or to execute lawful process. Process may be issued by the clerk, to be executed in any county of the State, and to be returned before him.

Certify and exemplify, under seal of his court, all documents, papers or records therein, which shall be received in evidence in all the courts of the State.

Preserve order in this court, punish criminal contempts, and hold persons in civil contempt; subject to the limitations contained in Chapter 5A of the General Statutes of North Carolina.

Adjourn any proceeding pending before him from time to time.

Open, vacate, modify, set aside, or enter as of a former time, decrees or orders of his court.

Enter default or judgment in any action or proceeding pending in his court as authorized by law.

Award costs and disbursements as prescribed by law, to be paid personally, or out of the estate or fund, in any proceeding before him.

Compel an accounting by magistrates and compel the return to the clerk of superior court by the person having possession thereof, of all money, records, papers, dockets and books held by such magistrate by virtue or color of his office.

Grant and revoke letters testamentary, letters of administration, and letters of trusteeship.

Appoint and remove guardians and trustees, as provided by law.

Audit the accounts of fiduciaries, as required by law.

Exercise jurisdiction conferred on him in every other case prescribed by law.

History.

C.C.P., ss. 417, 418, 442; Code, ss. 103, 108; 1901, c. 614, s. 2; Rev., s. 901; 1919, c. 140; C.S., s. 938; 1949, c. 57, s. 1; 1951, c. 28, s. 1; 1961, c. 341, s. 2; 1971, c. 363, s. 3; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1080, s. 5.

Cross References.

As to accounts of executors, etc., see

G.S. 1-406

,

G.S. 28A-20-1

et seq., and G.S. 28A-21 et seq.

As to use of copies of court papers in evidence, see

G.S. 8-34

.

As to depositions, see

G.S. 8-74

through 8-83.

As to clerks acting as notaries, see G.S. 10A-14.

As to duty of clerk to name successor to trustee in a deed of assignment for benefit of creditors, see G.S. 23-4.

As to probate, see G.S. 28A-2A-1, 47-1, 47-3, 47-7.

As to revocation of letters testamentary and of administration, see

G.S. 28A-8-4

and

G.S. 28A-9-1

et seq.

As to guardians, see G.S. 35A-1 et seq.

As to clerk’s release of funds held or corporate surety bond upon receipt of written agreement of parties, final judgment of a court, or a consent order, see G.S. 44A-16(b).

As to fixing compensation of commissioners for division of lands, see

G.S. 46-7.1

.